Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. State Hospital and Medical Facilities Survey and Construction

Editor's notes. —

Parts A, B and C, appearing in the text of ch. 159, Laws 1947, have been changed by the editor to divisions 1, 2 and 3, respectively, of this article.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Opposition to construction of new hospital or expansion of existing hospital's facilities as violation of Sherman Act (15 USC § 1 et seq.), 88 ALR Fed 478.